Missouri, session 2026, HB1817.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 192 and 660, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 192.023 and 660.080, to read as follows:
192.023. 1. The department shall, on a monthly basis, make a report available
on its website that lists for each public assistance program administered by the
department including, but not limited to, for each city, town, or village or county with
more than one thousand inhabitants:
(1) The total number of households enrolled;
(2) The total number of people served;
(3) The average monthly benefit received per household receiving benefits; and
(4) The number of households that became ineligible to receive benefits.
2. Nothing in this section shall require the disclosure of personally identifiable
information. The department shall not report confidential information and use only
aggregate data.
660.080. 1. The department shall, on a monthly basis, make a report available
on its website that lists for each public assistance program administered by the
department including, but not limited to, the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program, Temporary Assistance for Needy Families, and Women, Infants and Children,
for each city, town, or village or county with more than one thousand inhabitants:
(1) The total number of households enrolled;
(2) The total number of people served;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 1817 2
(3) The average monthly benefit received per household receiving benfits; and
(4) The number of households that became ineligible to receive benefits.
2. Nothing in this section shall require the disclosure of personally identifiable
information. The department shall not report confidential information and use only
aggregate data.
✔